North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 2. Acquisition and Control of State Parks. [Repealed]

§ 113-29.

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.10 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§§ 113-29.1 through 113-33.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(n), effective July 1, 2011.

History.

S. 113-29.1; 1957, c. 584, s. 1; 1969, c. 342, s. 2; 1973, c. 1262, ss. 28, 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 50; repealed by 2011-145, s. 13.25(n), effective July 1, 2011. s. 113-30; 1939, c. 317, s. 2; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 51; repealed by 2011-145, s. 13.25(n), effective July 1, 2011. s. 113-31; 1939, c. 317, s. 3; 1973, c. 1262, ss. 28, 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 52; repealed by 2011-145, s. 13.25(n), effective July 1, 2011. s. 113-32; 1939, c. 317, s. 4; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 53; repealed by 2011-145, s. 13.25(n), effective July 1, 2011. s. 113-33; 1939, c. 317, s. 5; repealed by 2011-145, s. 13.25(n), effective July 1, 2011.

§ 113-34.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.12 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-34.1.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.14 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-35.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.16 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-35.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-484, s. 5, effective August 26, 2009.

§ 113-36.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(n), effective July 1, 2011.

History.

1915, c. 253, s. 2; C.S., s. 6125; 1925, c. 122, s. 22; 1973, c. 1262, s. 28; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1981, c. 351, s. 1; 1989, c. 727, s. 57; 1999-237, s. 15; 2011-284, s. 74(a), (b); repealed by 2011-145, s. 13.25(n), effective July 1, 2011.

§ 113-37.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.18 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-38.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.25(n), effective July 1, 2011.

History.

Ex. Sess. 1920, c. 6; 1921, c. 179, s. 17; C.S., s. 6126(a); 1933, c. 537, s. 1; 1939, c. 152; 1943, c. 527; 1957, c. 694; 1959, c. 245; repealed by 2011-145, s. 13.25(n), effective July 1, 2011.

§ 113-39.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.20 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-40.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.22 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-41.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.24 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-42.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.26 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-43.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.28 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113-44.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.30 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(e), effective July 1, 2015.